public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A ar ivon/K [bdefgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ar
SFX A ar ivon/K [cjñ]ar
SFX A ar ivonse/K [bdefgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ar
SFX A ar ivonse/K [cjñ]ar
SFX A ar ié/O [bdefgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ar
SFX A ar ié/O [cjñ]ar
SFX A ar iéu/P [bdefgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ar
SFX A ar iéu/P [cjñ]ar
SFX A ar o/I [bdlnrsv]akiar
SFX A ar o/I [bft]ibiar
SFX A ar o/I [bmrtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar o/I [bs]ituar
SFX A ar o/I [bsx]ukiar
SFX A ar o/I [dflmr]isiar
SFX A ar o/I [dprs]aŧiar
SFX A ar o/I [dr]enonŧiar
SFX A ar o/I [ex]luviar
SFX A ar o/I [fjkx]uriar
SFX A ar o/I [flnrtv]iŧiar
SFX A ar o/I [gt]orbiar
SFX A ar o/I [klst]ubiar
SFX A ar o/I [kp]uniar
SFX A ar o/I [lmrtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar o/I [lmv]ariar
SFX A ar o/I [mn]ikiar
SFX A ar o/I [ms]arkiar
SFX A ar o/I [or]linear
SFX A ar o/I [pr]aviar
SFX A ar o/I [pt]udiar
SFX A ar o/I [rs]abiar
SFX A ar o/I [rs]upiar
SFX A ar o/I [rs]usiar
SFX A ar o/I [st]inuar
SFX A ar o/I [svŧ]idiar
SFX A ar o/I akuar
SFX A ar o/I arpiar
SFX A ar o/I asiar
SFX A ar o/I astiar
SFX A ar o/I axiar
SFX A ar o/I bruskiar
SFX A ar o/I desanguar
SFX A ar o/I dexalvear
SFX A ar o/I diladiar
SFX A ar o/I dopiar
SFX A ar o/I faliar
SFX A ar o/I fatuar
SFX A ar o/I frexiar
SFX A ar o/I frutuar
SFX A ar o/I graduar
SFX A ar o/I industriar
SFX A ar o/I induxiar
SFX A ar o/I inmutriar
SFX A ar o/I inonbriar
SFX A ar o/I insalviar
SFX A ar o/I intarsiar
SFX A ar o/I inŧendiar
SFX A ar o/I inŧipriar
SFX A ar o/I istansiar
SFX A ar o/I kanbiar
SFX A ar o/I konseliar
SFX A ar o/I kruŧiar
SFX A ar o/I lapiar
SFX A ar o/I marjiar
SFX A ar o/I neniar
SFX A ar o/I nuklear
SFX A ar o/I opiniar
SFX A ar o/I patriar
SFX A ar o/I petufiar
SFX A ar o/I piriar
SFX A ar o/I prinŧipiar
SFX A ar o/I raskiar
SFX A ar o/I remurkiar
SFX A ar o/I renunŧiar
SFX A ar o/I rexiduar
SFX A ar o/I senpiar
SFX A ar o/I stanŧiar
SFX A ar o/I storpiar
SFX A ar o/I tafiar
SFX A ar o/I tiviar
SFX A ar o/I torniar
SFX A ar o/I turbiar
SFX A ar o/I xmaniar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abcdeijklmnptvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abcdfgjklmnprstv]iđar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abcdlmrv]ixar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abcklrtŧ]ukar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abgnostvŧ]etar
SFX A ar o/IJ [abjnr]utar
SFX A ar o/IJ [acdflnoprsuv]inar
SFX A ar o/IJ [acfjprsuvŧ]ilar
SFX A ar o/IJ [acgkm]ucar
SFX A ar o/IJ [adeiot]ronar
SFX A ar o/IJ [adot]reŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [aeior]letar
SFX A ar o/IJ [aeors]teđar
SFX A ar o/IJ [af]idar
SFX A ar o/IJ [aijlnñđ]orar
SFX A ar o/IJ [aiklprŧ]enar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ailn]ŧinar
SFX A ar o/IJ [an]morar
SFX A ar o/IJ [an]sakrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ano]ketar
SFX A ar o/IJ [anrđ]ular
SFX A ar o/IJ [anu]xetar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ao]roŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ar]gonar
SFX A ar o/IJ [arst]ecar
SFX A ar o/IJ [at]ridar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcdfgiklmopruvñ]atar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcdfgikrstvx]anar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcfgjklmnoprtuvñ]aŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcfklprtvxŧ]iñar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcfntñ]ikar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcilrt]onbar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bclrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bcp]arlar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bdfgikmstxđ]urar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bdgklmnprstuv]ajar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bdgklmprtuv]añar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bdklmnoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bdkmrtx]ufar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bf]iskar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bfiklmtuv]antar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bfikr]adar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bfkv]alkar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bfmps]altar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bfr]uskar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bg]arbar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bgi]abar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bglmr]usar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bglr]indar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bgltvx]ardar
SFX A ar o/IJ [biklmrtv]askar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bilmprstvxñŧ]akar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bilmrtŧ]ankar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bk]oar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bklrtŧ]anpar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bl]ordar
SFX A ar o/IJ [blmpstuvx]irar
SFX A ar o/IJ [blprtuv]astar
SFX A ar o/IJ [blru]imar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bls]ekar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bmrxŧ]endar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bp]olsar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bs]olŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bs]orsar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bst]okar
SFX A ar o/IJ [bv]otar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cdfgklmnorŧ]eđar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cgijlpuv]anŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cklprtŧ]apar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ckr]inkar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cl]ibar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cmr]anxar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cprstŧ]upar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cprsŧ]exar
SFX A ar o/IJ [cps]ensar
SFX A ar o/IJ [crtv]ijar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dfgklmnoprstv]ejar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dijlmorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar o/IJ [djt]emar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dlmprsxŧ]eñar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dlnpr]eskar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dr]emenar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dr]esolar
SFX A ar o/IJ [dr]intar
SFX A ar o/IJ [es]kuilibrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fgklprt]uñar
SFX A ar o/IJ [filrst]umar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fk]alsar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fk]itar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fkp]icar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fks]aldar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fnp]orkar
SFX A ar o/IJ [frtv]angar
SFX A ar o/IJ [frtñ]ifar
SFX A ar o/IJ [frv]iscar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fu]arŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [fu]ilŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gj]oŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gjkpru]inŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gk]respar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gkmprđ]ontar
SFX A ar o/IJ [glopv]esar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gm]orgar
SFX A ar o/IJ [gs]olfar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ijrt]onfar
SFX A ar o/IJ [iklnptv]agar
SFX A ar o/IJ [iptv]ađar
SFX A ar o/IJ [itv]oxar
SFX A ar o/IJ [jtx]afar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kl]argar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kl]ontrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [klrsx]unar
SFX A ar o/IJ [klrt]ivar
SFX A ar o/IJ [km]astrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [knr]aspar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ko]roxar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kp]almar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kp]olpar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kp]oncar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kp]onteđar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kpu]artar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kr]axinar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kr]onŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kr]ostar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kr]ovar
SFX A ar o/IJ [krt]onkar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ks]alvar
SFX A ar o/IJ [kt]rikar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ln]tinar
SFX A ar o/IJ [lp]ongar
SFX A ar o/IJ [lpv]eŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [lr]istar
SFX A ar o/IJ [lv]egrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mnx]istrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mpr]incar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mpr]uar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mpsŧ]igar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mpux]andar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mr]ascar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mr]engar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ms]agrar
SFX A ar o/IJ [msx]ultar
SFX A ar o/IJ [mu]enŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ [nr]bojar
SFX A ar o/IJ [nrŧ]opar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]fiubar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]kadenar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]karnar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]kular
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]tilar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ns]timar
SFX A ar o/IJ [nx]boskar
SFX A ar o/IJ [nx]vidar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ors]torar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ou]fonar
SFX A ar o/IJ [pr]onpar
SFX A ar o/IJ [ps]alpar
SFX A ar o/IJ [pt]ipar
SFX A ar o/IJ [pt]urgar
SFX A ar o/IJ [rtñ]anfar
SFX A ar o/IJ [rx]ingar
SFX A ar o/IJ [rñ]infar
SFX A ar o/IJ [sŧ]avarjar
SFX A ar o/IJ [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar o/IJ adular
SFX A ar o/IJ alar
SFX A ar o/IJ albeđar
SFX A ar o/IJ alŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ amar
SFX A ar o/IJ andar
SFX A ar o/IJ ansar
SFX A ar o/IJ arar
SFX A ar o/IJ arbinar
SFX A ar o/IJ aretar
SFX A ar o/IJ arkar
SFX A ar o/IJ armar
SFX A ar o/IJ arsar
SFX A ar o/IJ asar
SFX A ar o/IJ avar
SFX A ar o/IJ balar
SFX A ar o/IJ barar
SFX A ar o/IJ baxnar
SFX A ar o/IJ bear
SFX A ar o/IJ binar
SFX A ar o/IJ bitar
SFX A ar o/IJ bolar
SFX A ar o/IJ buxnar
SFX A ar o/IJ derotar
SFX A ar o/IJ desfar
SFX A ar o/IJ despetar
SFX A ar o/IJ desturbar
SFX A ar o/IJ devorar
SFX A ar o/IJ dexredar
SFX A ar o/IJ dexumanar
SFX A ar o/IJ dixnar
SFX A ar o/IJ entrar
SFX A ar o/IJ entuxiaxmar
SFX A ar o/IJ fakinar
SFX A ar o/IJ fermar
SFX A ar o/IJ fibrar
SFX A ar o/IJ filtrar
SFX A ar o/IJ firmar
SFX A ar o/IJ fodrar
SFX A ar o/IJ formar
SFX A ar o/IJ fregar
SFX A ar o/IJ fugar
SFX A ar o/IJ furfar
SFX A ar o/IJ garxar
SFX A ar o/IJ gritar
SFX A ar o/IJ guar
SFX A ar o/IJ guidar
SFX A ar o/IJ inbalbar
SFX A ar o/IJ inbilar
SFX A ar o/IJ incepar
SFX A ar o/IJ inferetar
SFX A ar o/IJ infraxar
SFX A ar o/IJ inkolar
SFX A ar o/IJ inmagaxenar
SFX A ar o/IJ inpanar
SFX A ar o/IJ inpegar
SFX A ar o/IJ inrosar
SFX A ar o/IJ intrar
SFX A ar o/IJ inxaltrar
SFX A ar o/IJ isar
SFX A ar o/IJ iŧar
SFX A ar o/IJ kaminar
SFX A ar o/IJ kolar
SFX A ar o/IJ kolmar
SFX A ar o/IJ konstar
SFX A ar o/IJ konstatar
SFX A ar o/IJ kontenplar
SFX A ar o/IJ kopar
SFX A ar o/IJ koxenar
SFX A ar o/IJ koxinar
SFX A ar o/IJ kriar
SFX A ar o/IJ kuadrar
SFX A ar o/IJ kupar
SFX A ar o/IJ kurvar
SFX A ar o/IJ ledrar
SFX A ar o/IJ ligar
SFX A ar o/IJ likar
SFX A ar o/IJ lungar
SFX A ar o/IJ lustrar
SFX A ar o/IJ marcar
SFX A ar o/IJ maurar
SFX A ar o/IJ menar
SFX A ar o/IJ migrar
