public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
aflíxer/A
albitrar/A
alegrar/A
alŧetar/A
reandar/A
angosiar/A
arborar/A
argomentar/A
arpiar/A
inasiar/A
aŧalar/A
inaugurar/A
axardar/A
avar/A
bagajar/A
xbajafar/A
xbaketar/A
balanŧar/A
inbalinar/A
xbalotar/A
xbalŧar/A
bandonar/A
xbanpolar/A
xbarakar/A
xbarbatolar/A
xbarkar/A
barxeletar/A
bastardar/A
batiđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
bavar/A
xbaxir/A
xbefeđar/A
inbeletar/A
xberlar/A
inbestialir/A
xbevaciar/A
xbiankar/A
biaxemar/A
xbimar/A
bindolar/A
birbantar/A
bitar/A
xbixigolar/A
rebójer/A
reboɉir/A
bokiđar/A
inboloñar/A
xbolsonar/A
inbonbar/A
rebondolar/A
bordir/A
xboroŧar/A
xboskar/A
botonar/A
xboŧar/A
xbraitar/A
bragetar/A
dexbranar/A
xbrasolar/A
xbraŧolar/A
breviar/A
brilantar/A
inbrodar/A
dexbroɉar/A
brokolar/A
brontolar/A
inbrunir/A
budelar/A
xbufonar/A
inbusolar/A
inbuŧolar/A
buxinar/A
scanŧar/A
scarir/A
incavetar/A
scentrar/A
mancèñer/A
ascéñer/A
tracéñer/A
cibar/A
cipegar/A
cokolatar/A
benedir/A
redir/A
datar/A
dekiarar/A
deñar/A
detar/A
dexertar/A
diramar/A
indíxer/A
dobar/A
dolorar/A
redomandar/A
doparar/A
dorar/A
dexdoronar/A
xdotoređar/A
indriŧar/A
dúxer/A
tradúxer/A
đontar/A
đular/A
elèđer/A
riesir/A
exeguir/A
putrefar/A
faelar/A
falŧar/A
desfarinar/A
faŧionar/A
mortifegar/A
infemenir/A
konferir/A
festonar/A
infiamar/A
sfibrar/A
refikar/A
finir/A
firmar/A
subafitar/A
desfogar/A
folgorar/A
inforkar/A
fornir/A
fradeliđar/A
franŧexar/A
sfraŧar/A
rinfreskar/A
sfroñar/A
trafugar/A
funŧionar/A
dexgabanar/A
ingalonar/A
dexganŧar/A
dexgardar/A
gavasar/A
dexgobar/A
xgorbar/A
xgrafar/A
ingranerar/A
regraŧiar/A
ingremir/A
ingrintar/A
regroar/A
xgruñar/A
guarentar/A
dexgusar/A
inberir/A
ingorgar/A
inraukir/A
subintrar/A
iŧar/A
inɉavetar/A
inɉotar/A
akàder/A
kaɉar/A
kalkarar/A
deskalŧinar/A
kaneđar/A
kanonar/A
inkantonar/A
deskapitar/A
karatar/A
inkarnar/A
skartabelar/A
kaskar/A
katastegar/A
prekaŧar/A
inkavalkar/A
proklamar/A
kojonar/A
skolar/A
komandar/A
inkónber/A
inkonkolar/A
konsultar/A
konŧar/A
kórer/A
deskordar/A
korniđar/A
kostar/A
rekovèrđer/A
rekréser/A
krokolar/A
deskroxar/A
kuatar/A
skufonar/A
skulaŧar/A
skurŧar/A
lanbikar/A
lapaŧar/A
dexlaŧar/A
lèđer/A
lestir/A
lexitimar/A
limar/A
listar/A
prolongar/A
xludrar/A
stralúxer/A
magrar/A
permaner/A
mankar/A
xmañuŧar/A
marixar/A
dexmaselar/A
matiđar/A
maxegar/A
meɉorar/A
mentir/A
merkantar/A
perméter/A
militar/A
xmisiar/A
mokolar/A
mondar/A
moraliđar/A
xmoroxar/A
motivar/A
permudarar/A
inmurar/A
muŧar/A
inaspar/A
neniar/A
inobelir/A
dexnoxelar/A
xñifar/A
ofrir/A
adonbrar/A
opinar/A
oriđonar/A
ostinar/A
padir/A
spakar/A
palixar/A
pànder/A
spapolar/A
parecar/A
spartar/A
paseɉar/A
konpatir/A
inpaŧientar/A
pekar/A
spelatar/A
propénder/A
dispensar/A
despèrder/A
spertegar/A
petegolar/A
peŧolatar/A
traxpiantar/A
spiegar/A
piñatar/A
despirar/A
inpiumar/A
suplegar/A
despoltronar/A
dispóner/A
poncar/A
pontiñar/A
portar/A
inpostar/A
repovolar/A
prestar/A
inprimar/A
aprovar/A
purgar/A
rabiar/A
xraixar/A
ranpegar/A
rastelar/A
rekamar/A
reñar/A
xridakiar/A
rixegar/A
prorogar/A
ronkeđar/A
derotar/A
rugar/A
ruviɉar/A
sakañar/A
salivar/A
sangonar/A
sasinar/A
scànxer/A
desekar/A
suseguir/A
aseɉar/A
insenbrar/A
inseñar/A
oservar/A
sfraselar/A
silenŧiar/A
siropar/A
skalpolar/A
skarpinar/A
iskenar/A
skónder/A
deskríver/A
sofistegar/A
insolfar/A
insoniar/A
sòrxer/A
sparpañar/A
prosperar/A
spianŧar/A
spiritar/A
sprangar/A
sorastar/A
stankar/A
stekar/A
stimar/A
destivar/A
instradar/A
kostrénđer/A
destropar/A
stubiar/A
persuàder/A
sumar/A
susurar/A
destaɉar/A
destanar/A
taponar/A
tartaɉar/A
intaxar/A
preténder/A
tenpoređar/A
reténxer/A
astèñer/A
kontéñer/A
desterminar/A
texorar/A
tironar/A
destonar/A
intorbir/A
tortiɉar/A
tràer/A
trakar/A
trapanar/A
destraviar/A
destresar/A
trinŧar/A
trotar/A
turbiar/A
ŧaponar/A
ŧenɉar/A
deŧernir/A
reŧíder/A
ŧiolar/A
deŧolar/A
ulular/A
uxmar/A
xvalivar/A
xvaporar/A
desprovéder/A
revelar/A
redeventar/A
intraveñir/A
intravèñer/A
vergiđar/A
konversar/A
dexvestir/A
viađar/A
rekonvínŧer/A
revíver/A
evokar/A
voltolar/A
votar/A
xavaɉar/A
xdrumenar/A
rexetar/A
xlitar/A
xudegar/A
